Hawaii statutes.
[§428-1003] Activities not constituting
transacting business. (a) The activities of a foreign limited liability
company that do not constitute transacting business in this State within the
meaning of this part include:

(1) Maintaining, defending, or settling an action or
proceeding;

(2) Holding meetings of its members or managers or
carrying on any other activity concerning its internal affairs;

(3) Maintaining bank accounts;

(4) Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer,
exchange, and registration of the foreign limited liability company's own
securities or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those
securities;

(5) Selling through independent contractors;

(6) Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail
or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance
outside this State before they become contracts;

(7) Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, or
security interests in real or personal property;

(8) Securing or collecting debts or enforcing
mortgages or other security interests in property securing the debts, and
holding, protecting, and maintaining property so acquired;

(9) Conducting an isolated transaction that is
completed within thirty days and is not one in the course of similar transactions
of a like manner; or

(10) Transacting business in interstate commerce.

(b) For purposes of this part, the ownership
in this State of income-producing real property or tangible personal property,
other than property excluded under subsection (a), constitutes transacting
business in this State.

(c) This section does not apply in determining
the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited liability company
to service of process, taxation, or regulation under any other law of this State.
[L 1996, c 92, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next